Utah statutes.
53-7-312.   Division approval of certain storage system plans -- Procedure.

(1) (a)  The complete plans and specifications for all systems involving the storage of more than 5,000 water gallons of LPG shall be submitted to the division by a person licensed under this part, and receive approval by the division before installation is started.  The plans shall be drawn to scale and contain sufficient detail and clarity as necessary to indicate the nature and character of the proposed system and its compliance with this part.

(b)  Two copies of the plans shall be submitted to the division and one copy shall be returned to the applicant with approval or disapproval indicated on it.

(2) (a)  For dispensing systems for 5,000 water gallons or less of LPG, a detailed sketch or plan shall be submitted to the division by a person licensed under this part, and receive approval by the division before installation is started.

(b)  Two copies of the plans shall be submitted to the division and one copy shall be returned to the applicant with approval or disapproval indicated on it.



Amended by Chapter 14, 1995 General Session

